Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,137
Motor vehicle theft or fraud; notice; effect.

For purposes of sections 44-3,134 to 44-3,142, when an insurer provides any authorized agency with notice pursuant to section 44-3,136, such notice shall be deemed sufficient for all authorized agencies.

Laws 1987, LB 78, § 4.